Utah statutes.
31A-22-1503.   Motorboat liability policy minimum limits.

Policies containing motorboat liability coverage may not limit the insurer's liability under that coverage below the following:

(1) (a)  $25,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of one person, arising out of the use of a motorboat in any one accident;

(b)  subject to the limit for one person in Subsection (1)(a), in the amount of $50,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of two or more persons arising out of the use of a motorboat in any one accident; and

(c)  in the amount of $15,000 because of liability for injury to, or destruction of, property of others arising out of the use of a motorboat in any one accident; or

(2)  $65,000 in any one accident whether arising from bodily injury to or the death of others, or from destruction of, or damage to, the property of others.



Amended by Chapter 211, 2006 General Session

